Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,154
Districts organized at least one year; proceedings validated.

In all cases in which the county board of any county has purported to establish an irrigation district situated in whole or in part within such county, and such district has acted as an irrigation district for the period of at least one year prior to August 15, 1937, all acts and proceedings taken for the purpose of creating such district are hereby legalized, validated, and declared to be sufficient, and such irrigation district is hereby declared to be duly incorporated, and as such, said irrigation district under its corporate name shall have all the rights and privileges and be subject to all of the duties and obligations of a duly incorporated irrigation district.

Laws 1937, c. 105, § 1, p. 365;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,108;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,154.